Utah statutes.
78B-14-306.   Inappropriate tribunal.
If a petition or comparable pleading is received by an inappropriate tribunal
of this state, the tribunal shall forward the pleading and accompanying
documents to an appropriate tribunal in this state or another state and notify
the petitioner where and when the pleading was sent.
